District of Columbia statutes.
8-2203

Notice to clients.

Before undertaking any control measures, a wildlife control services provider shall provide to the client, in writing, the following:

(1)

An assessment of the problem, including identification of possible causes of the problem;

(2)

The methods and practices that may be used to resolve the problem, clearly specifying possible lethal and nonlethal means;

(3)

Agreed-upon disposition of the animal;

(4)

An estimate of the fee to be charged; and

(5)

Where applicable, the methods and practices which the client may employ in the future to limit recurrence of the problem.

Mar. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-289, § 4, 57 DCR 11499
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 7008, 61 DCR 9990

History

Former § 8-2203 has been recodified as § 8-2033.

Editor's Notes